Wyoming, session 2025, HB0152.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-4-1101 is created to read:

ARTICLE 11
BLOOD DONATIONS AND VACCINATIONS

HB0152

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0376
35-4-1101. Disclosure of mRNA vaccinations for blood
donations; labeling; right to request certain blood;
definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "COVID-19" means as defined in W.S.
1-1-141(a)(ii);

(ii) "Messenger ribonucleic acid vaccine" means
a type of vaccine that uses called messenger ribonucleic
acid to produce an immune response against a disease.

(b) Any person who collects human blood donations for
the purpose of providing blood for human blood transfusion
shall require blood donors to disclose whether the blood
donor has received a COVID-19 vaccine or a messenger
ribonucleic acid vaccine at any time.

(c) Blood originating from a donor who has received a
COVID-19 vaccine or a messenger ribonucleic acid vaccine
shall be conspicuously marked on the packaging of the blood
and any paperwork related to the blood.
HB0152

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0376

(d) In a nonemergency situation, as determined by the
health care provider providing medical services, a person
receiving a blood transfusion shall have the right to
request blood based on whether or not the blood originated
from a person who has received a COVID-19 vaccine or a
messenger ribonucleic acid vaccine, if the requested blood
is available at the facility.

Section 2. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0152